District of Columbia statutes.
14-102

Impeachment of witnesses.

(a)

The credibility of a witness may be attacked by any party, including the party calling the witness.

(b)

A statement is not hearsay if the declarant testifies at the trial or hearing and is subject to cross-examination concerning the statement and the statement is (1) inconsistent with the declarant’s testimony, and was given under oath subject to the penalty of perjury at a trial, hearing, or other proceeding, or in a deposition, or (2) consistent with the declarant’s testimony and is offered to rebut an express or implied charge against the witness of recent fabrication or improper influence or motive, or (3) an identification of a person made after perceiving the person. Such prior statements are substantive evidence.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 518, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
May 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-256, § 4, 42 DCR 20
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 23, 43 DCR 530

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 14-102.
1973 Ed., § 14-102.